Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Chapter 55. Mississippi Commission for National and Community Service

§ 43-55-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission for Volunteer Service established in Section 43-55-3.

“Community-based agency” means that term as defined in Section 101 of Title I, 42 USCS 12511.

“Corporation” means the Corporation for National and Community Service established in Section 191 of Title I, 42 USCS 12651.

“National service laws” means that term as defined in Section 101 of Title I, 42 USCS 12511.

“Out-of-school youth” means that term as defined in Section 101 of Title I, 42 USCS 12511.

“Title I” means Title I of the National and Community Service Act of 1990, Public Law 101-610.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 1; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-3.
Establishment and designation of Commission for National Community Service.

The Mississippi Commission for National and Community Service, established by Executive Order No. 1994-742, is hereby designated as the State Commission for Volunteer Service within the institutions of higher learning, established to encourage community service and volunteer participation as a means of community and state problem-solving; to promote and support voluntary citizen involvement in government and private programs throughout the state; to provide a means by which the state may develop a coordinated, unified plan in response to the National and Community Service Act of 1990, as amended by the National and Community Service Trust Act of 1993; to develop a long-term, comprehensive vision and plan of action for community service initiatives in Mississippi primarily focused in the areas of education, public safety, human needs and the environment; and to serve as the state’s liaison to national and state organizations that support its mission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 2; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-5.
Membership of commission; tenure; vacancies.

Members of the Commission for Volunteer Service shall be appointed by the Governor. The commission shall consist of no fewer than fifteen (15) and no more than twenty-five (25) members.

The commission members shall include as voting members, except as otherwise indicated, at least one (1) of each of the following:

An individual with expertise in the educational, training, and developmental needs of youth, particularly disadvantaged youth.

An individual with experience in promoting service and volunteerism among older adults.

A representative of a community-based agency.

The superintendent of the State Department of Education, or his or her designee.

A representative of local government.

A representative of local labor organizations.

A representative of business.

An individual between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-five (25) who is a participant or supervisor in a program as defined in Section 101 of Title I, 42 USCS 12511.

A representative of a national service program described in Section 122(a) of Title I, 42 USCS 12572.

The employee of the corporation designated under Section 195 of Title I, 42 USCS 12651f, as the representative of the corporation in this state, as a nonvoting member.

In addition to the members described in subsection (2), the commission may include as voting members any of the following:

Local educators.

Experts in the delivery of human, educational, environmental, or public safety services to communities and persons.

Representative of Native American tribes.

Out-of-school youth or other at-risk youth.

Representatives of entities that receive assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973, Public Law 93-113, 87 Stat. 394.

A member of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning.

Not more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the voting commission members shall be officers or employees of this state. The Governor may appoint additional officers or employees of state agencies operating community service, youth service, education, social service, senior service, and job training programs, as nonvoting, ex officio members of the commission.

The Governor shall ensure, to the maximum extent possible, that the commission membership is diverse with respect to race, ethnicity, age, gender, and disability characteristics.

Except as provided in this subsection, members of the commission shall serve for staggered three-year terms expiring on October 1. The members constituting the Mississippi Commission for Volunteer Service under Executive Order No. 1994-742 on March 28, 1996, shall serve on the commission for the remainder of the terms for which they were appointed. Of the additional members, the Governor shall appoint one-third (1/3) of the initial members for a term of one (1) year; one-third (1/3) for a term of two (2) years; and one-third (1/3) for a term of three (3) years. Following expiration of these initial terms, all appointments shall be for three-year renewable terms. Members of the commission may not serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.

A vacancy on the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments, and any member so appointed shall serve during the remainder of the term for which the vacancy occurred. The vacancy shall not affect the power of the remaining commission members to execute the duties of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-7.
Commission functions.

The voting members of the commission shall elect one (1) of the voting members to serve as chairperson of the commission. The voting members of the commission may elect other officers from among the members of the commission.

The commission shall meet quarterly. However, the commission shall meet more frequently at the call of the chairperson or if requested by five (5) or more members.

A majority of the members of the commission constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business at a meeting of the commission. A majority of the voting members present and serving are required for official action of the commission.

Except as provided in subsection (5), a voting member of the commission shall not participate in the administration of the grant program described in Section 43-55-13(s), including any discussion or decision regarding the provision of assistance or approved national service positions, or the continuation, suspension, or termination of assistance or such positions, to any program or entity if both of the following apply:

A grant application relating to the grant program is pending before the commission.

The application was submitted by a program or entity of which a member is, or in the one-year period before the submission of such application was, an officer, director, trustee, full-time volunteer, or employee.

If, as a result of the operation of subsection (4), the number of voting members of the commission is insufficient to establish a quorum for the purpose of administering the grant program described in Section 43-55-13(s), the voting members excluded from participation by subsection (4) may participate in the administration of the grant program, to the extent permitted by regulations issued by the corporation under Section 193A(b)(11) of Title I, 42 USCS 12651d.

Subsection (4) does not limit the authority of any voting member of the commission to participate in either of the following:

The discussion of, and hearing and forums on the general duties, policies, and operations of, the commission or the general administration of the grant program described in Section 43-55-13(s).

Similar general matters relating to the commission.

The business which the commission may perform shall be conducted at a public meeting of the commission held in compliance with the open meetings act.

A writing prepared, owned, used, in possession of, or retained by the commission in the performance of an official function is subject to the Freedom of Information Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 4; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-9.
Composition of commission.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation. However, members of the commission may be reimbursed for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties as members of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 5; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-11.
Commission staff; executive director.

The commission shall have staff necessary for the commission to perform its functions. The commission staff shall include an executive director. The executive director shall report directly to the commission for the purpose of giving and making recommendations on programs and laws related to volunteerism and community service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 6; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-13.
Duties of commission.

The commission shall do all of the following:

Promote increased coordination, visibility, and support for volunteers of all ages, especially youth and senior citizens, and community service in meeting the unmet needs of communities.

Ensure that its funding decisions meet all federal and state requirements.

Recommend innovative, creative, statewide service programs to increase volunteer participation in all age groups and community-based problem solving among diverse participants.

Develop and implement a centralized system for obtaining information and technical support concerning volunteerism and community service recruitment, projects, training methods, materials, and activities throughout this state. The commission shall provide the information and support upon request.

Promote interagency collaboration to maximize resources and develop a model of such collaboration on the state level.

Provide public recognition and support of volunteer efforts that address community needs by individuals, by private sector organizations and businesses, and partnerships between the public and private sectors.

Stimulate increased community awareness of the effects of volunteer services in this state.

Utilize local, state and federal resources to initiate, strengthen, and expand quality service programs.

Serve as this state’s representative to national and state organizations that support the commission’s mission.

Prepare for this state a national three-year service plan that is developed through an open and public process that provides maximum participation and input from national service programs in this state and other interested members of the public. The plan shall be updated annually and contain information that the commission considers appropriate or the corporation requires. The plan shall ensure outreach to diverse community-based agencies that serve under-represented populations, by either using established state networks and registries or establishing these networks and registries.

Prepare this state’s financial assistance applications under Section 117B of Title I, 42 USCS 12543, and Section 130 of Title I, 42 USCS 12582.

Assist in the preparation of the Department of Education’s application for assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973, Public Law 93-113, 87 Stat. 394.

Prepare this state’s application under Section 130 of Title I, 42 USCS 12582, for the approval of service positions that include the national service educational award described in Division D of Title I, 42 USCS 12601 to 12604.

Make recommendations to the corporation with respect to priorities for programs receiving assistance under the Domestic Volunteer Service Act of 1973, Public Law 93-113, 87 Stat. 394.

Make technical assistance available to enable applicants for assistance under Section 121 of Title I, 42 USCS 12571, to plan and implement service programs and to apply for assistance under the national service laws, using information and materials available through a clearing house established under Section 198A of Title I, 42 USCS 12653a, if appropriate.

Assist participants in national service programs that receive assistance under Section 121 of Title I, 42 USCS 12571, in attaining health care and child care under Section 140 of Title I, 42 USCS 12594.

Develop a state system for the recruitment and placement of participants in programs that receive assistance under the national service laws.

Disseminate information about national service programs that receive assistance under the national service positions.

Use assistance provided under Section 121 of Title I, 42 USCS 12571, to administer this state’s grant program in support of national service programs including the selection, oversight, and evaluation of grant recipients.

Develop projects, training methods, curriculum materials, and other materials and activities related to national service programs that receive assistance directly from the corporation or from the state using assistance provided under Section 121 of Title I, for use by such programs upon request.

Establish policies and procedures for the use of federal funds received under Title I of the national service laws.

Coordinate its functions, including recruitment, public awareness, and training activities, with any division of the Corporation for National and Community Service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 7; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-15.
Prohibition against carrying out national service program receiving assistance.

The commission shall not directly carry out any national service program that receives assistance under Section 121 of Title I, 42 USCS 12571.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 8; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-17.
Delegation of nonpolicy making duties.

Subject to requirements prescribed by the corporation, the commission may delegate nonpolicy making duties to a state agency or to a public or private nonprofit organization.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-19.
Commission to comply with requirements of federal law.

The commission shall comply with all requirements of federal law, including but not limited to requirements of coordination with other state agencies or with volunteer service programs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-21.
State cooperation with commission.

State departments and agencies shall cooperate with the commission in the performance of its functions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-23.
Administration and support of commission functions; application, receipt, and expenditure of funds, grants, and services.

The institutions of higher learning and the Office of the Governor shall provide necessary administrative and staff support services to the State Commission for Volunteer Service. Additional support services may be provided, including, but not limited to, the use of office space, furniture and equipment, motor vehicles, travel and other related services. The commission shall employ an executive director, who shall be initially designated by the Governor. The executive director shall employ such staff as is necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Future executive directors shall be selected by the commission.

The commission may procure information and assistance from the state or any subdivision, municipal corporation, public officer, or governmental department or agency thereof. All agencies, officers, and political subdivisions of the state or municipal corporations shall provide the office with all relevant information and reasonable assistance on any matters of research within their knowledge or control.

The commission may apply for, receive, and expend funds, grants, and services from local, state, or federal government, or any of their agencies, or any other public or private sources and is authorized to use funds derived from these sources for purposes reasonable and necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter. The commission also may expend moneys, upon appropriation by the Legislature, from the Mississippi Commission for Volunteer Service Fund created in Section 43-55-29.

The commission shall submit its budget request through the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning. Such request shall be submitted by the board of trustees as a separate and distinct request made on behalf of the commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 12; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 12; Laws, 1997, ch. 580, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1997.

§ 43-55-25.
Availability of funds.

All new programs authorized in this chapter are subject to the availability of funds specifically appropriated therefor by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 13; reenacted without change, Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

§ 43-55-27.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1997, ch. 355, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1997).

[Laws, 1996, ch. 438, § 14]

§ 43-55-29.
Mississippi Commission for Volunteer Service Fund.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund known as the “Mississippi Commission for Volunteer Service Fund” (hereinafter referred to as “fund”). The fund shall consist of monies obtained from contributions made pursuant to Section 27-7-90, and from the additional fees collected under Section 27-19-56.16. Monies in the fund, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may be expended by the Mississippi Commission for Volunteer Service, established in Section 43-55-3, Mississippi Code of 1972, to carry out the purposes of Sections 43-55-1 through 43-55-27, Mississippi Code of 1972. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of the fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 580, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 536, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2000.